Washington statutes.
RCW 9.41.075

Concealed pistol license—Revocation.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1163-S2.SL) ***

(1) The license shall be revoked by a law enforcement agency immediately upon:

(a) Discovery by the law enforcement agency that the licensee was ineligible under RCW 9.41.070 for a concealed pistol license when applying for the license or license renewal;

(b) Conviction of the licensee, or the licensee being found not guilty by reason of insanity, of an offense, or commitment of the licensee for mental health treatment, that makes a person ineligible under RCW 9.41.040 to possess a firearm;

(c) Conviction of the licensee for a third violation of this chapter within five calendar years;

(d) An order that the licensee forfeit a firearm under RCW 9.41.098(1)(d); or

(e) The law enforcement agency's receipt of an order to surrender and prohibit weapons or an extreme risk protection order, other than an ex parte temporary protection order, issued against the licensee.

(2)(a) Unless the person may lawfully possess a pistol without a concealed pistol license, an ineligible person to whom a concealed pistol license was issued shall, within 14 days of license revocation, lawfully transfer ownership of any pistol acquired while the person was in possession of the license.

(b) Upon discovering a person issued a concealed pistol license was ineligible for the license, the law enforcement agency shall contact the department of licensing to determine whether the person purchased a pistol while in possession of the license. If the person did purchase a pistol while in possession of the concealed pistol license, if the person may not lawfully possess a pistol without a concealed pistol license, the law enforcement agency shall require the person to present satisfactory evidence of having lawfully transferred ownership of the pistol. The law enforcement agency shall require the person to produce the evidence within 15 days of the revocation of the license.

(3) When a licensee is ordered to forfeit a firearm under RCW 9.41.098(1)(d), the law enforcement agency shall:

(a) On the first forfeiture, revoke the license for one year;

(b) On the second forfeiture, revoke the license for two years; or

(c) On the third or subsequent forfeiture, revoke the license for five years.

Any person whose license is revoked as a result of a forfeiture of a firearm under RCW 9.41.098(1)(d) may not reapply for a new license until the end of the revocation period.

(4) The law enforcement agency shall notify, in writing, the department of licensing of the revocation of a license. The department of licensing shall record the revocation.

[ 2021 c 215 s 73; 2005 c 453 s 4; 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 408.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.

Severability—2005 c 453: See note following RCW 9.41.040.

Finding—Intent—Severability—1994 sp.s. c 7: See notes following RCW 43.70.540.

Effective date—1994 sp.s. c 7 ss 401-410, 413-416, 418-437, and 439-460: See note following RCW 9.41.010.